Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.32.280

Arguments advocating approval or disapproval—Preparation by committees. (Effective until January 1, 2025.)

For each measure from a unit of local government that is included in a local voters' pamphlet, the legislative authority of that jurisdiction shall, not later than the resolution deadline, formally appoint a committee to prepare arguments advocating voters' approval of the measure and shall formally appoint a committee to prepare arguments advocating voters' rejection of the measure. The authority shall appoint persons known to favor the measure to serve on the committee advocating approval and shall, whenever possible, appoint persons known to oppose the measure to serve on the committee advocating rejection. Each committee shall have not more than three members, however, a committee may seek the advice of any person or persons. If the legislative authority of a unit of local government fails to make such appointments by the prescribed deadline, the county auditor shall whenever possible make the appointments.

[ 2015 c 146 s 3; 2003 c 111 s 820. Prior: 1994 c 191 s 2; 1984 c 106 s 10. Formerly RCW 29.81A.080.]

PDFRCW 29A.32.280

Arguments advocating approval or disapproval—Preparation by committees. (Effective January 1, 2025.)

(1) For each measure from a unit of local government included in a local voters' pamphlet, the legislative authority of that jurisdiction shall, not later than the resolution deadline, formally appoint a committee to prepare arguments advocating voters' approval of the measure and shall formally appoint a committee to prepare arguments advocating voters' rejection of the measure.

(2) The authority shall appoint persons that reside within the jurisdictional boundaries and are known to favor the measure to serve on the committee advocating approval and shall, whenever possible, appoint persons that reside within the jurisdictional boundaries and are known to oppose the measure to serve on the committee advocating rejection.

(3) Each committee shall have not more than three members, however, a committee may seek the advice of any person or persons.

(4) If the legislative authority of a unit of local government fails to make such appointments by the prescribed deadline, the county auditor shall issue a media release and publish information on the auditor's election website announcing the opportunity to form committees and provide statements. If the legislative authority is unable to make appointments, the auditor shall make appointments on a first-come, first-served basis if qualified committee members contact the auditor by the appropriate deadline.

(5) If no statement is produced, the auditor shall include a statement in the pamphlet stating that no person in the jurisdiction contacted the auditor to provide a statement, and there are no statements for that measure.

[ 2024 c 78 s 12; 2015 c 146 s 3; 2003 c 111 s 820. Prior: 1994 c 191 s 2; 1984 c 106 s 10. Formerly RCW 29.81A.080.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 78: See note following RCW 29A.32.010.